New Jersey, session 222, S751.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The jurisdiction and authority vested pursuant to existing law in the Department of Health to conduct inspections of on-farm dairy processing operations is hereby transferred to the Department of Agriculture. b.  The Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the Department of Health and local boards of health, shall oversee all inspections of on-farm dairy processing activities. c.     (1)        All books, papers, records, documents, and equipment in the custody of, or maintained for the use of, the Department of Health for purposes of conducting inspections of on-farm dairy processing operations are transferred to the Department of Agriculture. (2)   All employees of the Department of Health who participate in the inspection of on-farm dairy processing operations are transferred to the Department of Agriculture. Persons transferred pursuant to this paragraph shall be assigned to such duties as the Secretary of Agriculture determines. 2.    The Secretary of Agriculture may adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3. This act shall take effect immediately.